Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4852.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ANOKA COUNTY AND CITY OF HAM LAKE; MARKED TRUNK HIGHWAY 65.new text end new text begin $16,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for preliminary engineering, environmental documentation, final design, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of intersection improvements along marked Trunk Highway 65 at Anoka County State-Aid Highway 116, also known as Bunker Lake Boulevard Northeast, and associated frontage roads and backage roads within the trunk highway system. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2031. new text end